Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1005.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The vendor fee in section 39-26-105, Colorado Revised Statutes,
was designed to reimburse retailers for a specific service performed on
behalf of the state: The collection and remittance of state-collected sales tax
revenue;
(b) Not all retailers are equally compensated for their services. Only
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

retailers that have total taxable sales of $1 million or less for the filing
period are able to collect the vendor fee, and most of Colorado's home rule
cities do not pay similar vendor fees for the collection and remittance of
local sales tax. In addition, not all state taxes have vendor fees.
(c) The vendor fee is being removed to promote fairness and
equality between all retailers by ending this benefit that some retailers
receive and others do not receive. Further, the vendor fee is being removed
to simplify the collection of state-collected sales tax, ease administrative
burden, and relieve retailer confusion. Any revenue gain caused by the
removal of the vendor fee is incidental to the primary purposes of
promoting fairness and equality, simplifying the collection of state-collected
sales tax, easing administrative burdens, and relieving retailer confusion.
(d) Any revenue gain caused by the removal of the vendor fee is de
minimis.
(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that:
(a) Removal of the vendor fee is not a tax policy change for
purposes of section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the Colorado constitution
because it does not in any way affect the amount of sales tax imposed on
and paid by taxpayers but instead only distributes a small portion of gross
sales tax revenue collected to vendors for their collection and remittance of
state-collected sales tax revenue;
(b) Further, even if removal of the vendor fee could be considered
a tax policy change, consistent with the Colorado Supreme Court's holding
in TABOR Found. v. Reg'l Transp. Dist., 2018 CO 29, that legislation that
causes only an incidental and de minimis tax revenue increase does not
amount to a new tax or a tax policy change that requires advance voter
approval under section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, the
removal of the vendor fee is neither a new tax nor a tax policy change that
requires voter approval; and
(c) The removal of the vendor fee does not create new
responsibilities or burdens on retailers. Instead, the removal of the fee
demonstrates the general assembly's intent that the collection of sales tax
revenue be fair and equal throughout the state, and that the burdens of doing
so are limited, fair, and equal throughout the state.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 25B-1005

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-26-105, amend
(1)(c), (1)(d)(I), and (5)(c); and add (1)(d)(V) as follows:
39-26-105. Vendor liable for tax - definitions - repeal.
(1) (c) (I) Every retailer shall remit, along with the return required in
subsection (1)(b) of this section, an amount equivalent to the percentage on
sales as specified in subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section to the executive
director of the department of revenue, less an amount as set forth in
subsection (1)(c)(II) or (1)(d) of this section to cover the retailer's expense
in the collection and remittance of said tax.
(II) For sales made prior to January 1, 2020, the amount retained by
a retailer to cover the retailer's expense in collecting and remitting tax
pursuant to this section is three and one-third percent of all sales tax
reported.
(III) If any retailer is delinquent in remitting said tax, other than in
unusual circumstances shown to the satisfaction of the executive director
of the department of revenue, the retailer shall not be allowed to retain any
amounts under this subsection (1)(c) or subsection (1)(d) of this section to
cover such retailer's expense in collecting and remitting said tax, and an
amount equivalent to the said percentage, plus the amount of any local
vendor expense that may be allowed by the local government to the vendor,
shall be remitted to the executive director by any such delinquent vendor.
Any local vendor expense remitted to the executive director shall be
deposited to the state general fund.
(d) (I) (A) For sales made on or after January 1, 2020, except as
provided in subsection (1)(d)(I)(B) of this section BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1,
2026, the amount retained by a retailer to cover the retailer's expense in
collecting and remitting tax in accordance with this section is four percent
of the tax reported; except that a retailer shall not retain more than one
thousand dollars in any filing period.
(B) For sales made on and after January 1, 2023, but before January
1, 2024, the amount retained by a retailer to cover the retailer's expense in
collecting and remitting tax in accordance with this section for any filing
period that the retailer's total taxable sales are less than or equal to one
hundred thousand dollars is five and three-tenths percent of the tax
reported; except that a retailer should not retain more than one thousand
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 25B-1005

dollars in any filing period. This subsection (1)(d)(I)(B) is repealed,
effective January 1, 2032.
(V) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, A RETAILER IS NOT PERMITTED TO
RETAIN ANY MONEY TO COVER THE RETAILER'S EXPENSES IN COLLECTING
AND REMITTING STATE TAX IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
REGARDLESS OF THE RETAILER'S TOTAL TAXABLE SALES FOR ANY FILING
PERIOD.
(5) (c) From the amount of the tax required to be remitted pursuant
to subsection (5)(a) of this section, a qualified purchaser shall be entitled to
retain the amount specified in subsection (1)(c)(II) or (1)(d) of this section
that a retailer would otherwise be entitled to retain to cover the retailer's
expense in collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this article 26 if the
qualified purchaser had not provided a direct payment permit number to the
retailer.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-46-303, amend (12)
as follows:
24-46-303. Definitions. As used in this part 3, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(12) "State sales tax increment revenue" means the portion of the
revenue derived from state sales taxes, including any revenue attributable
to the baseline growth rate, collected within a designated regional tourism
zone in excess of the amount of base year revenue. "State sales tax
increment revenue" does not include any additional revenue derived from
state sales taxes that are due to the changes set forth in section 39-26-105
(1)(d), enacted in 2019 AND AS AMENDED THEREAFTER, to the amount
retained by a vendor to cover the vendor's expenses in collecting and
remitting sales tax.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-26-123, amend
(3)(b)(I); and add (3)(b)(III) as follows:
39-26-123. Receipts - disposition - transfers of general fund
surplus - sales tax holding fund - creation - definitions. (3) For any state
fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2013, the state treasurer shall
credit eighty-five percent of all net revenue collected under this article 26
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 25B-1005

to the old age pension fund created in section 1 of article XXIV of the state
constitution. The state treasurer shall credit to the general fund the
remaining fifteen percent of the net revenue, less:
(b) (I) (A) Except as set forth in subsection (3)(b)(II) of this section,
PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2026, an amount equal to the fiscal year increase in
sales and use tax revenue attributable to the vendor fee changes made by
House Bill 19-1245, enacted in 2019, which amount the state treasurer shall
credit to the housing development grant fund created in section 24-32-721
(1).
(B) EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION
AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (3)(b)(III) OF THIS SECTION, BEGINNING
JANUARY 1, 2026, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO ONE AND SIX HUNDRED FIFTY-FIVE
THOUSANDTHS PERCENT OF NET REVENUE EXCLUDING NET REVENUE
COLLECTED UNDER PART 2 OF THIS ARTICLE 26, WHICH AMOUNT THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL CREDIT TO THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT GRANT FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 24-32-721 (1).
(III) (A) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, THE TREASURER SHALL
CREDIT THE EXCESS OF THE AMOUNT SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I)(B)
OF THIS SECTION OVER ONE-TWELFTH OF THE AMOUNT SET FORTH IN
SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II)(D) OF THIS SECTION ON A MONTHLY BASIS. THE
TREASURER SHALL FIRST TAKE INTO ACCOUNT ANY REDUCTION MADE
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE FISCAL YEAR
TO DATE.
(B) BEGINNING WITH STATE FISCAL YEAR 2026-27, THE TREASURER
SHALL CREDIT THE EXCESS OF THE AMOUNT SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION
(3)(b)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION OVER ONE-TWELFTH OF THE APPLICABLE
AMOUNT SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION ON A
MONTHLY BASIS.
SECTION 5. Appropriation. (1) For the 2025-26 state fiscal year,
$156,219 is appropriated to the department of revenue. This appropriation
is from the general fund. To implement this act, the department may use this
appropriation as follows:
(a) $5,576 for use by the executive director's office for personal
services related to administration and support;
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 25B-1005

(b) $79,616 for use by the taxation business group for personal
services related to taxation services, which amount is based on an
assumption that the division will require an additional 1.2 FTE;
(c) $24,876 for use by the taxation business group for operating
expenses related to taxation services;
(d) $9,768 for tax administration IT system (GenTax) support; and
(e) $36,383 for the purchase of document management services.
(2) For the 2025-26 state fiscal year, $36,383 is appropriated to the
department of personnel. This appropriation is from reappropriated funds
received from the department of revenue under subsection (1)(e) of this
section. To implement this act, the department of personnel may use this
appropriation to provide document management services for the department
of revenue.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 25B-1005

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Connor Randall Esther van Mourik
ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 25B-1005